Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB564.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 53AMENTAL HEALTH CRISIS RESPONSESec.53A01. Definitions.53A02. 988 public education campaign.53A03. Evaluation and report.§ 53A01. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 1234567891011121314151617 context clearly indicates otherwise:"911 system." As defined in section 5302 (relating to definitions)."988 crisis call center." A call center designated by the Commonwealth to respond to Statewide or regional calls from the 988 suicide and crisis lifeline."988 suicide and crisis lifeline." The universal telephone number within the United States designated for the purpose of the national suicide prevention and mental health crisis hotline system operating through the National Suicide Prevention Lifeline program in accordance with 42 U.S.C. § 290bb-36c (relating to National Suicide Prevention Lifeline program)."Campaign." The 988 public education campaign described under section 53A02 (relating to 988 public education campaign)."Department." The Department of Human Services of the Commonwealth."Emergency responder." Any of the following:(1) A current or former certified emergency medical services provider or current or former member of an emergency medical services agency, fire company or rescue company.(2) A peace officer.(3) A 911 dispatcher.(4) A coroner or medical examiner who responds in an official capacity to an emergency.(5) A corrections officer.§ 53A02. 988 public education campaign.(a) Implementation.-- No later than 180 days after the effective date of this subsection, SUBJECT TO AVAILABLE FUNDING, the department shall implement a campaign to increase public understanding and engagement with the 988 suicide and crisis 20250HB0564PN1831 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 lifeline in this Commonwealth to:(1) Promote awareness of 988 services and other local helplines and resources to support individuals during a mental health crisis.(2) Encourage the appropriate use of the 988 suicide and crisis lifeline as an alternative to the 911 system.(3) Provide information about suicide prevention measures and the warning signs of suicide.(b) Consultation.--To administer the campaign and ensure that the messages of the campaign are effectively tailored, the department shall consult with the following:(1) The Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs.(2) 988 crisis call centers in this Commonwealth.(3) Advocacy groups focused on suicide prevention, including organizations that address the unique challenges of suicide prevention in both rural and urban environments, provide services and support to veterans and emergency responders and provide services and support to non-English speakers.(4) Crisis counselors and other mental health professionals specializing in suicide prevention.(5) Individuals with lived experiences of mental health or substance use crisis.(c) Materials and resources.--(1) To administer the campaign, the department:(i) Shall utilize a variety of materials and resources, including print media, social media graphics, posters and displays, which shall be:(A) Posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.20250HB0564PN1831 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) Designed to be mobile-friendly.(C) Available in multiple languages, as deemed necessary by the department.(D) Designed to ensure effective communication with the diverse populations and cultures across this Commonwealth.(ii) May utilize existing materials and resources, including 988-related materials and resources developed by the United States Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration.(2) All materials and resources that are produced by the department for the campaign must comply with the act of December 20, 2015 (P.L.497, No.90), known as the Taxpayer-Funded Advertising Transparency Act.§ 53A03. Evaluation and report.(a) Initial report.--Within 180 days of the effective date of this subsection, the department shall submit a report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives. The department shall ensure that the report, at a minimum, includes all of the following:(1) A comprehensive review of the department's efforts to raise awareness of the 988 suicide and crisis lifeline, detailing activities, key metrics utilized and budget allocations and expenditures.(2) A performance summary, including call volume data and the usage of the 988 suicide and crisis lifeline chat and text functions, key findings, recommendations and any preliminary or final reports generated from efforts to raise 20250HB0564PN1831 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 awareness of the 988 suicide and crisis lifeline.(3) Information on 988 suicide and crisis lifeline operations, including a breakdown of calls received, in-State answer rates, services provided to callers and the percentage of calls requiring crisis intervention.(4) Insights or recommendations from the consultations specified under section 53A02(b) (relating to 988 public education campaign).(5) A summary of ongoing or planned initiatives to further promote awareness of the 988 suicide and crisis lifeline.(b) Updated report.--Within one year of the submission of the report under subsection (a), the department shall submit an updated report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives. The department shall ensure that the updated report includes all of the following:(1) Updated statistics on 988 suicide and crisis lifeline operations.(2) Information on new campaigns or initiatives to raise awareness of the 988 suicide and crisis lifeline, including metrics, target audiences and performance evaluations.(3) The impact of the new campaigns or initiatives under paragraph (2) on the utilization of the 988 suicide and crisis lifeline, including the in-State answer rate, call volume and the number of Pennsylvanians receiving services or referrals.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0564PN1831 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829